Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.315

Initial licenses.

The secretary may, at his or her discretion, issue an initial license instead of a full license, to an agency or facility for a period not to exceed six months, renewable for a period not to exceed two years, to allow such agency or facility reasonable time to become eligible for full license.

[ 2018 c 58 s 39; 2006 c 265 s 309. Formerly RCW 43.215.280.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.